Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-806
Transfer of case.

The judge of the conciliation court may transfer any case before the conciliation court pursuant to the Conciliation Court Law to the presiding judge of the county court or to the presiding judge of the district court, as appropriate, for assignment for trial or other proceedings by another judge of the court, whenever in the opinion of the judge of the conciliation court such transfer is necessary to expedite the business of the conciliation court or to insure the prompt consideration of the case. When any case is so transferred, the judge to whom it is transferred shall act as the judge of the conciliation court in the matter.

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 6, p. 655;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 25.